Massachusetts, session 194th, H5537.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the six per cent limit on the amount of local excise tax that 
a municipality other than the City of Boston may impose on the transfer of occupancy of any 
room in a bed and breakfast establishment, hotel, lodging house, or motel contained in chapter 
64G, section 3A of the General Laws, or any other general or special law to the contrary, the 
City of Salem is hereby authorized to impose a local excise tax upon such transactions at a rate 
not to exceed 8.75 per cent. 
SECTION 2. The additional revenue attributable to the 2.75 percentage point increase 
authorized by section 1, representing the difference between a local excise tax imposed at the 
rate of 6 per cent and a local excise tax imposed at a rate up to 8.75 per cent, shall be deposited 
into a separate special revenue fund to be established by the City of Salem. 

of 2 11  Amounts deposited into said fund shall be used solely for the planning, design, 
acquisition, construction, reconstruction, renovation, repair, improvement, furnishing, equipping, 
maintenance, and extraordinary maintenance of school or municipal buildings and facilities of 
the City of Salem, including, but not limited to, the payment of debt service on bonds or notes 
issued for such purposes. 
Nothing in this act shall be construed to limit, impair, or otherwise affect the eligibility or 
authority of the City of Salem to apply for, receive, or expend grants, reimbursements, or other 
financial assistance from the Massachusetts School Building Authority or any other federal, 
state, or local source for the purposes described in this section. 
Any balance remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the 
general fund and shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes set forth in this section. 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage